District of Columbia statutes.
2-214.02

Rules.

Within 90 days of March 26, 2008, the Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of this title, shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted by the Mayor to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding weekends, holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the rules within the 45-day review period, in whole or in part, by resolution, the rules shall be deemed approved.

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-136, § 3, 55 DCR 1685

History